Illinois, session 104th, SB2203.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Preventing Algorithmic Discrimination Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Algorithmic discrimination" means the condition in which 8an automated decision tool contributes to unjustified 9differential treatment or impacts disfavoring people based on 10their actual or perceived race, color, ethnicity, sex, 11religion, age, national origin, limited English proficiency, 12disability, veteran status, genetic information, reproductive 13health, or any other classification protected by State law. 14"Algorithmic discrimination" does not include: 15        (1) the offer, license, or use of a high-risk 16    artificial intelligence system by a deployer for the sole 17    purpose of:18            (A) the deployer's self-testing to identify, 19        mitigate, or prevent discrimination or otherwise 20        ensure compliance with state and federal law; or21            (B) expanding an applicant, customer, or 22        participant pool to increase diversity or redress 23        historical discrimination; or   SB2203- 2 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1        (2) an act or omission by or on behalf of a private 2    club or other establishment that is not in fact open to the 3    public, as set forth in the Civil Rights Act of 1964.4    "Artificial intelligence system" means a machine-based 5system that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers, from 6the input it receives, how to generate outputs such as 7predictions, content, recommendations, or decisions that can 8influence physical or virtual environments. "Artificial 9intelligence system" includes a generative artificial 10intelligence system. For the purposes of this definition, 11"generative artificial intelligence system" means an automated 12computing system that, when prompted with human prompts, 13descriptions, or queries, can produce outputs that simulate 14human-produced content, including, but not limited to:15        (1) textual outputs, such as short answers, essays, 16    poetry, or longer compositions or answers;17        (2) image outputs, such as fine art, photographs, 18    conceptual art, diagrams, and other images; 19        (3) multimedia outputs, such as audio or video in the 20    form of compositions, songs, or short-form or long-form 21    audio or video; and22        (4) other content that would otherwise be produced by 23    human means24    "Automated decision tool" means a system or service that 25uses artificial intelligence and has been specifically 26developed and marketed to, or specifically modified to, make,   SB2203- 3 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1or be a controlling factor in making, consequential decisions.2    "Consequential decision" means a decision or judgment that 3has a legal, material, or similarly significant effect on an 4individual's life relating to the impact of, access to, or the 5cost, terms, or availability of, any of the following:6        (1) employment, worker management, or self-employment, 7    including, but not limited to, all of the following:8            (A) pay or promotion;9            (B) hiring or termination; and10            (C) automated task allocation;11        (2) education and vocational training, including, but 12    not limited to, all of the following:13            (A) assessment, including, but not limited to, 14        detecting student cheating or plagiarism;15            (B) accreditation;16            (C) certification;17            (D) admissions; and18            (E) financial aid or scholarships;19        (3) housing or lodging, including rental or short-term 20    housing or lodging;21        (4) essential utilities, including electricity, heat, 22    water, Internet or telecommunications access, or 23    transportation;24        (5) family planning, including adoption services or 25    reproductive services, as well as assessments related to 26    child protective services;  SB2203- 4 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1        (6) healthcare or health insurance, including mental 2    health care, dental, or vision;3        (7) financial services, including a financial service 4    provided by a mortgage company, mortgage broker, or 5    creditor;6        (8) the criminal justice system, including, but not 7    limited to, all of the following:8            (A) risk assessments for pretrial hearings;9            (B) sentencing; and10            (C) parole;11        (9) legal services, including private arbitration or 12    mediation;13        (10) voting; and14        (11) access to benefits or services or assignment of 15    penalties.16    "Deployer" means a person, partnership, State or local 17government agency, or corporation that uses an automated 18decision tool to make a consequential decision.19    "Impact assessment" means a documented risk-based 20evaluation of an automated decision tool that meets the 21criteria of Section 10.22    "Sex" includes pregnancy, childbirth, and related 23conditions, gender identity, intersex status, and sexual 24orientation.25    "Significant update" means a new version, new release, or 26other update to an automated decision tool that includes   SB2203- 5 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1changes to its use case, key functionality, or expected 2outcomes. 3    Section 10. Impact assessment.4    (a) On or before January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, 5a deployer of an automated decision tool shall perform an 6impact assessment for any automated decision tool the deployer 7uses that includes all of the following:8        (1) a statement of the purpose of the automated 9    decision tool and its intended benefits, uses, and 10    deployment contexts;11        (2) a description of the automated decision tool's 12    outputs and how they are used to make, or be a controlling 13    factor in making, a consequential decision;14        (3) a summary of the type of data collected from 15    natural persons and processed by the automated decision 16    tool when it is used to make, or be a controlling factor in 17    making, a consequential decision;18        (4) an analysis of potential adverse impacts on the 19    basis of sex, race, color, ethnicity, religion, age, 20    national origin, limited English proficiency, disability, 21    veteran status, or genetic information from the deployer's 22    use of the automated decision tool;23        (5) a description of the safeguards implemented, or 24    that will be implemented, by the deployer to address any 25    reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination   SB2203- 6 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1    arising from the use of the automated decision tool known 2    to the deployer at the time of the impact assessment;3        (6) a description of how the automated decision tool 4    will be used by a natural person, or monitored when it is 5    used, to make, or be a controlling factor in making, a 6    consequential decision; and7        (7) a description of how the automated decision tool 8    has been or will be evaluated for validity or relevance.9    (b) A deployer shall, in addition to the impact assessment 10required by subsection (a), perform, as soon as feasible, an 11impact assessment with respect to any significant update.12    (c) This Section does not apply to a deployer with fewer 13than 25 employees unless, as of the end of the prior calendar 14year, the deployer deployed an automated decision tool that 15impacted more than 999 people per year. 16    Section 15. Notification and accommodations.17    (a) A deployer shall, at or before the time an automated 18decision tool is used to make a consequential decision, notify 19any natural person who is the subject of the consequential 20decision that an automated decision tool is being used to 21make, or be a controlling factor in making, the consequential 22decision. A deployer shall provide to a natural person 23notified under this subsection all of the following:24        (1) a statement of the purpose of the automated 25    decision tool;  SB2203- 7 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1        (2) the contact information for the deployer; and2        (3) a plain language description of the automated 3    decision tool that includes a description of any human 4    components and how any automated component is used to 5    inform a consequential decision.6    (b) If a consequential decision is made solely based on 7the output of an automated decision tool, a deployer shall, if 8technically feasible, accommodate a natural person's request 9to not be subject to the automated decision tool and to be 10subject to an alternative selection process or accommodation. 11After a request is made under this subsection, a deployer may 12reasonably request, collect, and process information from a 13natural person for the purposes of identifying the person and 14the associated consequential decision. If the person does not 15provide that information, the deployer shall not be obligated 16to provide an alternative selection process or accommodation. 17    Section 20. Governance program.18    (a) A deployer shall establish, document, implement, and 19maintain a governance program that contains reasonable 20administrative and technical safeguards to map, measure, 21manage, and govern the reasonably foreseeable risks of 22algorithmic discrimination associated with the use or intended 23use of an automated decision tool. The safeguards required by 24this subsection shall be appropriate to all of the following:25        (1) the use or intended use of the automated decision   SB2203- 8 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1    tool;2        (2) the deployer's role as a deployer;3        (3) the size, complexity, and resources of the 4    deployer;5        (4) the nature, context, and scope of the activities 6    of the deployer in connection with the automated decision 7    tool; and8        (5) the technical feasibility and cost of available 9    tools, assessments, and other means used by a deployer to 10    map, measure, manage, and govern the risks associated with 11    an automated decision tool.12    (b) The governance program required by this Section shall 13be designed to do all of the following:14        (1) identify and implement safeguards to address 15    reasonably foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination 16    resulting from the use or intended use of an automated 17    decision tool;18        (2) if established by a deployer, provide for the 19    performance of impact assessments as required by Section 20    10;21        (3) conduct an annual and comprehensive review of 22    policies, practices, and procedures to ensure compliance 23    with this Act;24        (4) maintain for 2 years after completion the results 25    of an impact assessment; and26        (5) evaluate and make reasonable adjustments to   SB2203- 9 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1    administrative and technical safeguards in light of 2    material changes in technology, the risks associated with 3    the automated decision tool, the state of technical 4    standards, and changes in business arrangements or 5    operations of the deployer.6    (c) A deployer shall designate at least one employee to be 7responsible for overseeing and maintaining the governance 8program and compliance with this Act. An employee designated 9under this subsection shall have the authority to assert to 10the employee's employer a good faith belief that the design, 11production, or use of an automated decision tool fails to 12comply with the requirements of this Act. An employer of an 13employee designated under this subsection shall conduct a 14prompt and complete assessment of any compliance issue raised 15by that employee.16    (d) This Section does not apply to a deployer with fewer 17than 25 employees unless, as of the end of the prior calendar 18year, the deployer deployed an automated decision tool that 19impacted more than 999 people per year. 20    Section 25. Public statement of policy. A deployer shall 21make publicly available, in a readily accessible manner, a 22clear policy that provides a summary of both of the following:23        (1) the types of automated decision tools currently in 24    use or made available to others by the deployer; and25        (2) how the deployer manages the reasonably   SB2203- 10 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1    foreseeable risks of algorithmic discrimination that may 2    arise from the use of the automated decision tools it 3    currently uses or makes available to others. 4    Section 30. Algorithmic discrimination. 5    (a) A deployer shall not use an automated decision tool 6that results in algorithmic discrimination.7    (b) On and after January 1, 2028, a person may bring a 8civil action against a deployer for violation of this Section. 9In an action brought under this subsection, the plaintiff 10shall have the burden of proof to demonstrate that the 11deployer's use of the automated decision tool resulted in 12algorithmic discrimination that caused actual harm to the 13person bringing the civil action.14    (c) In addition to any other remedy at law, a deployer that 15violates this Section shall be liable to a prevailing 16plaintiff for any of the following:17        (1) compensatory damages;18        (2) declaratory relief; and19        (3) reasonable attorney's fees and costs. 20    Section 35. Impact assessment.21    (a) Within 60 days after completing an impact assessment 22required by this Act, a deployer shall provide the impact 23assessment to the Attorney General.24    (b) A deployer who knowingly violates this Section shall   SB2203- 11 -LRB104 10978 SPS 21060 b1be liable for an administrative fine of not more than $10,000 2per violation in an administrative enforcement action brought 3by the Attorney General. Each day on which an automated 4decision tool is used for which an impact assessment has not 5been submitted as required under this Section shall give rise 6to a distinct violation of this Section.7    (c) The Attorney General may share impact assessments with 8other State entities as appropriate. 9    Section 40. Enforcement. A violation of this Act 10constitutes an unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud and 11Deceptive Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and 12authority granted to the Attorney General by the Consumer 13Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be available 14to him or her for the enforcement of this Act. 15    Section 95. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 16Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 17    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)18    Sec. 2HHHH. Violations of the Preventing Algorithmic 19Discrimination Act. A person who violates the Preventing 20Algorithmic Discrimination Act commits an unlawful practice 21within the meaning of this Act.